dev/verbs/tests.yaml
Config:
  Gen: tgl-gen.fst
  Morph: tgl-morph.fst

Tests:
  Verb - bili:
    bili+V+Inf: [bili]
    bili+V+Prog+Loc: [binibilian]
    bili+V+Prog+Ben: [ibinibili]
    bili+V+Prog+Act1: [bumibili]
    bili+V+Prog+Act2: [nagbibili]
    bili+V+Prog+Act3: [nabibili]
    bili+V+Prog+Act4: [nangbibili]
    bili+V+Prog+Rea: [ikinabibili]
    bili+V+Prog+Obj1: [binibili]
    bili+V+Prog+Obj3: [binibilian]
    bili+V+Prog+Obj2: [ibinibili]
    bili+V+Prog+Ins: [ipinambibili, ipinabibili, ipinanbibili]
    bili+V+Comp+Loc: [binilian]
    bili+V+Comp+Ben: [ibinili]
    bili+V+Comp+Act1: [bumili]
    bili+V+Comp+Act2: [nagbili]
    bili+V+Comp+Act3: [nabili]
    bili+V+Comp+Act4: [nangbili]
    bili+V+Comp+Rea: [ikinabili]
    bili+V+Comp+Obj1: [binili]
    bili+V+Comp+Obj3: [binilian]
    bili+V+Comp+Obj2: [ibinili]
    bili+V+Comp+Ins: [ipinamili, ipinanbili, ipinabili]
    bili+V+Inf+Loc: [bilian]
    bili+V+Inf+Ben: [ibili]
    bili+V+Inf+Act1: [bumili]
    bili+V+Inf+Act2: [magbili]
    bili+V+Inf+Act3: [mabili]
    bili+V+Inf+Act4: [mangbili]
    bili+V+Inf+Rea: [ikabili]
    bili+V+Inf+Obj1: [bilhin]
    bili+V+Inf+Obj3: [bilian]
    bili+V+Inf+Obj2: [ibili]
    bili+V+Inf+Ins: [ipamili, ipanbili, ipabili]
    bili+V+Cont+Loc: [bibilian]
    bili+V+Cont+Ben: [ibibili]
    bili+V+Cont+Act1: [bibili]
    bili+V+Cont+Act2: [magbibili]
    bili+V+Cont+Act3: [mabibili]
    bili+V+Cont+Act4: [mangbibili]
    bili+V+Cont+Rea: [ikabibili]
    bili+V+Cont+Obj1: [bibilhin]
    bili+V+Cont+Obj3: [bibilian]
    bili+V+Cont+Obj2: [ibibili]
    bili+V+Cont+Ins: [ipambibili, ipanbibili, ipabibili]
    bili+V+Imp+Obj1: [bili, bilia]
    bili+V+Imp+Obj3: [bilhi]
    bili+V+Imp+Obj2: [bilian]
    bili+V+Imp+Act1: [bili]
    bili+V+Imp+Act2: [pagbili]
    bili+V+Imp+Act4: [pangbili]

  Verb - sunong:
    sunong+V+Inf: [sunong]
    sunong+V+Prog+Loc: [sinusunongan]
    sunong+V+Prog+Ben: [isinusunong]
    sunong+V+Prog+Act1: [sumusunong]
    sunong+V+Prog+Act2: [nagsusunong]
    sunong+V+Prog+Act3: [nasusunong]
    sunong+V+Prog+Act4: [nangsusunong]
    sunong+V+Prog+Rea: [ikinasusunong]
    sunong+V+Prog+Obj1: [sinusunong]
    sunong+V+Prog+Obj3: [sinusunongan]
    sunong+V+Prog+Obj2: [isinusunong]
    sunong+V+Prog+Ins: [ipinamsusunong, ipinasusunong, ipinansusunong]
    sunong+V+Comp+Loc: [sinunongan]
    sunong+V+Comp+Ben: [isinunong]
    sunong+V+Comp+Act1: [sumunong]
    sunong+V+Comp+Act2: [nagsunong]
    sunong+V+Comp+Act3: [nasunong]
    sunong+V+Comp+Act4: [nangsunong]
    sunong+V+Comp+Rea: [ikinasunong]
    sunong+V+Comp+Obj1: [sinunong]
    sunong+V+Comp+Obj3: [sinunongan]
    sunong+V+Comp+Obj2: [isinunong]
    sunong+V+Comp+Ins: [ipinamsunong, ipinansunong, ipinasunong]
    sunong+V+Inf+Loc: [sunongan]
    sunong+V+Inf+Ben: [isunong]
    sunong+V+Inf+Act1: [sumunong]
    sunong+V+Inf+Act2: [magsunong]
    sunong+V+Inf+Act3: [masunong]
    sunong+V+Inf+Act4: [mangsunong]
    sunong+V+Inf+Rea: [ikasunong]
    sunong+V+Inf+Obj1: [sunongin]
    sunong+V+Inf+Obj3: [sunongan]
    sunong+V+Inf+Obj2: [isunong]
    sunong+V+Inf+Ins: [ipamsunong, ipansunong, ipasunong]
    sunong+V+Cont+Loc: [susunongan]
    sunong+V+Cont+Ben: [isusunong]
    sunong+V+Cont+Act1: [susunong]
    sunong+V+Cont+Act2: [magsusunong]
    sunong+V+Cont+Act3: [masusunong]
    sunong+V+Cont+Act4: [mangsusunong]
    sunong+V+Cont+Rea: [ikasusunong]
    sunong+V+Cont+Obj1: [susunongin]
    sunong+V+Cont+Obj3: [susunongan]
    sunong+V+Cont+Obj2: [isusunong]
    sunong+V+Cont+Ins: [ipamsusunong, ipansusunong, ipasusunong]
    sunong+V+Imp+Obj1: [sunong, sunonga]
    sunong+V+Imp+Obj3: [sunongi]
    sunong+V+Imp+Obj2: [sunongan]
    sunong+V+Imp+Act1: [sunong]
    sunong+V+Imp+Act2: [pagsunong]
    sunong+V+Imp+Act4: [pangsunong]

  Verb - bakasyon:
    bakasyon+V+Inf: [bakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Loc: [binabakasyonan]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Ben: [ibinabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Act1: [bumabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Act2: [nagbabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Act3: [nababakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Act4: [nangbabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Rea: [ikinababakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Obj1: [binabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Obj3: [binabakasyonan]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Obj2: [ibinabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Prog+Ins: [ipinambabakasyon, ipinababakasyon, ipinanbabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Loc: [binakasyonan]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Ben: [ibinakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Act1: [bumakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Act2: [nagbakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Act3: [nabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Act4: [nangbakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Rea: [ikinabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Obj1: [binakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Obj3: [binakasyonan]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Obj2: [ibinakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Comp+Ins: [ipinamakasyon, ipinanbakasyon, ipinabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Loc: [bakasyonan]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Ben: [ibakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Act1: [bumakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Act2: [magbakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Act3: [mabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Act4: [mangbakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Rea: [ikabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Obj1: [bakasyonin]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Obj3: [bakasyonan]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Obj2: [ibakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Inf+Ins: [ipamakasyon, ipanbakasyon, ipabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Loc: [babakasyonan]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Ben: [ibabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Act1: [babakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Act2: [magbabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Act3: [mababakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Act4: [mangbabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Rea: [ikababakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Obj1: [babakasyonin]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Obj3: [babakasyonan]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Obj2: [ibabakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Cont+Ins: [ipambabakasyon, ipanbabakasyon, ipababakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Imp+Obj1: [bakasyon, bakasyona]
    bakasyon+V+Imp+Obj3: [bakasyoni]
    bakasyon+V+Imp+Obj2: [bakasyonan]
    bakasyon+V+Imp+Act1: [bakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Imp+Act2: [pagbakasyon]
    bakasyon+V+Imp+Act4: [pangbakasyon]
